Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that there are several factors at play for the shortage of large animal veterinarians. The legislature finds that the shortage of large animal veterinarians is a critical issue for animal welfare and disease prevention, but also for public health because the shortage affects the safety of the food supply.(a) First, Washington's agricultural economy and agricultural communities are under enormous strain, and this deters medical professionals from choosing a future connected to the industry. The legislature recognizes that in 2023, labor expenses per farming operation in Washington were 462 percent higher than the national average and Washington is currently losing on average, two farms per day. The legislature further recognizes that farmers do not control their own prices and cannot simply respond to increased production costs by increasing the prices of their goods. These economic pressures are also impacting agriculture workers' mental health, and agriculture suicides are nearly 25 percent higher than the overall state rate. From 2020 through 2022, the suicide rate for agricultural workers in Washington state was 21.1 per 100,000 people, compared with 14.9 per 100,000 people for the state's general population.(b) Second, the state has added nearly 2,000,000 people over the last 20 years, but not increased class sizes at the state's college of veterinary medicine.(c) Third, many large animal veterinarians have left the field due to long hours, unpredictable schedules, and higher wages available for small animal care.(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to convene a work group to study and recommend strategies to recruit, train, and retain large animal veterinarians in Washington.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. (1) Washington State University's division of governmental studies and services shall convene a work group to study and recommend strategies to recruit, train, and retain large animal veterinarians in Washington. The work group must provide a preliminary report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2025, and a final report to the appropriate committees of the legislature by June 30, 2026, in conformance with RCW 43.01.036.(2) This section expires July 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) The work group created in section 2 of this act is composed of the following members:(a) The director of the department of agriculture, or the director's designee;(b) The secretary of the department of health, or the secretary's designee;(c) The dean of Washington State University college of veterinary medicine, or the dean's designee;(d) The Washington state veterinarian, or the veterinarian's designee;(e) One representative from an organization representing veterinarians;(f) One representative from an organization representing farmers and ranchers;(g) One representative from an organization representing livestock producers;(h) One adult leader representing a national youth development program that includes experiential learning in agriculture and large animal husbandry;(i) The director of equity of the department of agriculture, or the director's designee; and(j) One representative from a historically marginalized community, such as a member of an organization that promotes the agricultural sciences and related fields in a positive manner among communities that have been historically underrepresented or marginalized.(2) This section expires July 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. If specific funding for the purposes of this act, referencing this act by bill or chapter number, is not provided by June 30, 2025, in the omnibus appropriations act, this act is null and void.--- END ---